tables/hu-exceptionwords.cti
always borzsört 12-135-1235-126-234-12345-1235-2345 For example borzsörte word
always mézzsel 134-16-126-345-15-123	For example mézzselé word
always lázsöm 123-4-126-234-12345-134	For example lázsömör word
always szsen 234-345-15-1345	For example tudószseni, nyelvjárászseni words
always karajzs 13-1-1235-1-245-345	For example karajzseb word
always mezsk 134-15-126-234-13	For example mezskandallum word
always blúzst 12-123-346-126-234-2345	For example blúzstílus word
always varázszacs 1236-1-1235-4-345-126-1-146	For example varázszacskó word
always bűzsar 12-23456-126-234-1-1235	For example bűzsarkok word
always ízslág 34-126-234-123-4-1245	For example ízsláger word
always gázsp 1245-4-126-234-1234	For example gázspektrométer word
always kondenzs 13-135-1345-145-15-1345-126-234	For example kondenzsáv word
always kondenzsz 13-135-1345-145-15-1345-126-156	For example kondenzszerű word
always meccszs 134-15-146-146-345	For example meccszsákolás word
always rézsü 1235-16-345-12356	For example rézsüvonal, rézsüz words
always kabarézs 13-1-12-1-1235-16-345	For example kabarézseni word
always szárazsú 156-4-1235-1-126-234-346	For example szárazsúly word
always szervizsp 156-15-1235-1236-24-126-234-1234	For example szervizspecialista, szervizspray word
always szervizse 156-15-1235-1236-24-126-234-15	For example szervizsegítség word
always szervizst 156-15-1235-1236-24-126-234-2345	For example szervizstop word
always glükózsz 1245-123-12356-13-246-126-156	For example glükózszirup word
always glükózs 1245-123-12356-13-246-126-234	For example glükózstimulátor word
always százschil 156-4-126-234-14-125-24-123	For example százschillinges word
always üdvözsé 12356-145-1236-12345-126-234-16	For example üdvözség word
always bagázsá 12-1-1245-4-345-4	For example bagázsával word not need applying the next line related exception
always gázsáv 1245-4-126-234-4-1236
always mezsor 134-15-126-234-135-1235	For example mezsorsolás word
always mezsp 134-15-126-234-1234	For example mezsportolás word
always gázsat 1245-4-126-234-1-2345	For example gázsatu word
always meccsz 134-15-146-146-126	For example meccszaj word
always csimpánzsz 146-24-134-1234-4-1345-126-156	For example csimpánzszerű word
always csimpánzs 146-24-134-1234-4-1345-126-234	For example csimpánzsport word
always ízsorn 34-126-234-135-1235-1345	For example ízsornak word
always ízsorre 34-126-234-135-1235-1235-15	For example ízsorrendnek word

#Historical person names related exceptions
always táncsics 2345-4-1345-146-24-146	Táncsics Mihály is a historical person for 1848. march 15 hungarian revolution
always táncsiccs 2345-4-1345-146-24-146-146	Táncsics Mihály is a historical person for 1848. march 15 hungarian revolution
always batthyány =	Batthyány Lajos was the first hungarian president for 1848 freedom and revolution 
always thököly =
always vörösmarty =	Mihály Vörösmarty is a very important author for hungarian literary
partword indszenty 24-1345-145-156-15-1345-2345-13456
always anonymu =
always kiszely 13-24-156-15-123-13456	For example István Kiszely name related need this exception
always hatvany =
always skultéty =
always kukorelly =	For example Kukorelly Endre artist name
always áprily =	For example Áprily Lajos hungarian artist name
always nemeskürty =	For example Nemeskürty István artist name
always jékely =	For example Jékely Zoltán artist name
always szamuely 156-1-134-136-15-123-13456	For example Szamuely Tibor related

#Town names related exceptions
#Following section containing hungarian town names
begword agyagossz 1-1456-1-1245-135-234-156	For example Agyagosszergény town name
begword békéssz 12-16-13-16-234-156	For example Békésszentandrás town name
begword gombossz 1245-135-134-12-135-234-156	For example Gombosszeg town name
begword kapossz 13-1-1234-135-234-156	For example Kaposszekcső, Kaposszerdahely town names
begword kemenessz 13-15-134-15-1345-15-234-156	For example Kemenesszentmárton, Kemenesszentpéter town names
begword kiszsid 13-24-234-345-24-145	For example Kiszsidány town name
begword kisszent 13-24-234-156-15-1345-2345	For example Kisszentmárton tow name
begword kisszig 13-24-234-156-24-1245	For example Kissziget town name
begword mikossz 134-24-13-135-234-156	For example Mikosszéplak town name
begword nemessz 1345-15-134-15-234-156	For example Nemesszalók, Nemesszentandrás town names
begword szamossz 156-1-134-135-234-156	For example Szamosszeg town name
begword szilvássz 156-24-123-1236-4-234-156	For example Szilvásszentmárton town name
begword vámossz 1236-4-134-135-234-156	For example Vámosszabadi town name
always vaszar 1236-1-156-1-1235	For example Vaszar town name
begword vázsno 1236-4-345-1345-135	For example Vázsnok town name
partword rizszab 1235-24-345-126-1-12	For example rizszabáló word
partword rizszáp	1235-24-345-126-4-1234	For example rizszápor word
partword masszázszuh 134-1-156-156-4-345-126-136-125	For example masszázszuhany, masszázszuhanyokkal words

#Metrics related corrections
noback correct "GHZ-" "GHz-"
noback correct "MHZ-" "MHz-"
noback correct "IPV6-" "IPv6-"
